Maryland, session 2025, HB0528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
11–205.
(c) (1) In BALTIMORE COUNTY AND Calvert County, a police officer may
enforce the provisions of the Maryland Vehicle Law on a private roadway in [Calvert
County] THE COUNTY that is located within a residential subdivision or community and
used for vehicular travel by residents of the subdivision or community.
(2) IN BALTIMORE COUNTY, BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025,
THROUGH THE END OF JUNE 30, 2028, A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THE
PROVISIONS OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW ON A PRIVATE ROADWAY WITHIN
THE QUEEN ANNE VILLAGE COMMUNITY IN OWINGS MILLS THAT IS USED FOR
VEHICULAR TRAFFIC BY RESIDENTS OF THE COMMUNITY FOR THE PERIOD
BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND ENDING JULY 1, 2028, IN BALTIMORE COUNTY,
A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE
LAW ON A PRIVATE ROADWAY WITHIN THE QUEEN ANNE VILLAGE COMMUNITY IN
OWINGS MILLS THAT IS USED FOR VEHICULAR TRAFFIC BY RESIDENTS OF THE
COMMUNITY.
21–101.1.
(b) (1) A person may not drive a motor vehicle in violation of any provision of
this title on any:
(I) ANY private property that is used by the public in general,; or,
in BALTIMORE COUNTY AND Calvert County, on any
(II) ANY private [road] ROADWAY located within:
1. IN CALVERT COUNTY, a residential subdivision or
community; OR
2. IN BALTIMORE COUNTY, BEGINNING OCTOBER 1,
2025, THROUGH THE END OF JUNE 30, 2028, THE QUEEN ANNE VILLAGE
COMMUNITY IN OWINGS MILLS.

HOUSE BILL 528 3
(b) (1) A person may not drive a motor vehicle in violation of any provision of
this title on any private property that is used by the public in general, or[, in Calvert County,]
on any private [road] ROADWAY located within [a]:
(I) A residential subdivision or community IN CALVERT COUNTY;
OR
(II) FOR THE PERIOD BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND
ENDING JULY 1, 2028, THE QUEEN ANNE VILLAGE COMMUNITY IN OWINGS MILLS
IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before September 1,
2028, the Baltimore County Police Department shall report to the members of the
Baltimore County Delegation to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, on the implementation of this Act and whether it has improved
compliance with the Maryland Vehicle Law in the Queen Anne Village community in
Owings Mills.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.